District of Columbia statutes.
19-503

Requirement of survival by 120 hours under governing instruments.

Except as provided in section 19-506 , for purposes of a provision of a governing instrument that relates to an individual surviving an event, including the death of another individual, an individual who is not established by clear and convincing evidence to have survived the event by 120 hours is deemed to have predeceased the event.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 202, 48 DCR 2087

This section was previously enacted by section 1 of Public Law 89-183, 79 Stat. 700, but repealed by implication by D.C. Law 13-292.

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 3 of the Uniform Simultaneous Death Act (1993 Act).

1973 Ed., § 19-503.
1981 Ed., § 19-503.